Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF162.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1104YH (4) 91 th/ns H.F. 162 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 321.270 Required alcohol and drug 1 analysis for department employees. 2 1. A person employed by the department who was involved in 3 an accident or collision resulting in injury or death while 4 operating a motor vehicle owned by the department or other 5 state entity shall provide a specimen of the personâs urine for 6 analysis of the specimen to determine the alcohol concentration 7 or presence of a controlled substance or other drugs. The 8 person shall provide the specimen to a peace officer as soon 9 as practicable within two hours after the person is involved 10 in the accident or collision. 11 2. A specimen provided under this section shall be analyzed 12 in a manner in accordance with chapter 321J to determine the 13 alcohol concentration or presence of a controlled substance or 14 other drugs. 15 3. The person may have an independent analysis performed 16 on the provided specimen, administered at the personâs own 17 expense. The failure or inability of the person to obtain 18 an independent analysis does not preclude the admission of 19 evidence of the results of the analysis administered pursuant 20 to this section. Upon the request of the person who provided a 21 specimen, the results of the analysis administered pursuant to 22 this section shall be made available to the person. 23 4. This section does not apply if a blood, breath, or urine 24 specimen is taken pursuant to chapter 321J. 25